Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-540
Appropriations for probation, Department
of Correctional Services, legal education, and Consortium for Crime and Justice
Research; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate:

(1) To the
Office of Probation Administration:

(a) Five million dollars to expand mental
health services with priority population being participants in the specialized
substance abuse supervision program and problem-solving courts; and

(b) Three million
eight hundred thousand dollars for new reporting centers and expanded services;

(2) To the Vocational
and Life Skills Program under the Department of Correctional Services, five
million dollars to carry out the program;

(3) To the Legal Education for Public Service
and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund, five hundred thousand dollars
from the General Fund; and

(4) To the Consortium for Crime and Justice Research at the University
of Nebraska at Omaha, two hundred thousand dollars to facilitate the establishment
of the Nebraska Center for Justice Research at the University of Nebraska
at Omaha. The mission of the center shall be to develop and sustain research
capacity internal to the State of Nebraska to assist the Legislature in research,
evaluation, and policymaking to reduce recidivism, promote the use of evidence-based
practices in corrections, and improve public safety.

Laws 2014, LB907, § 19.